Hawaii, session 2026, GM1269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that in the State, land
is a precious and limited resource, and zoning laws often
distinguish between land used for agricultural purposes and
other uses, such as residential or commercial development. The
lack of a uniform standard for what constitutes a bona fide
farmer can lead to discrepancies in the way agricultural zoning
is applied. Landholders who are not truly engaged in farming
may take advantage of agricultural zoning designations,
potentially reducing available agricultural land and undermining
the State’s efforts to preserve land for commercial agricultural
activities. This creates conflicts with the preservation and
allocation of agricultural resources, which should be reserved
for farmers who are engaged in genuine farming activities.
The legislature acknowledges that some of the persistent
difficulties in Hawaii agriculture have been reconciling the
diversity of agricultural practices with the need for a uniform,
enforceable standard that prevents abuse of agricultural tax
2026-2381 SB2153 GDI SMA-2.docx

Page 2
S.B. NO.
-"2
C.D. 1
classifications and land entitlements, incorporating the breadth
and scope of agricultural activity in the State and providing
comprehensive language that successfully incorporates county
level zoning and property tax ordinances regarding land and
water usage.
The purpose of this Act is to require the department of
agriculture and biosecurity to convene a bona fide farmer
working group to develop multi-tiered, matrix-based definitions
for the terms "bona fide farmer" and "bona fide agricultural
activity".
SECTION 2. (a) The department of agriculture and
biosecurity shall convene a bona fide farmer working group to
develop multi-tiered, matrix-based definitions for the terms
"bona fide farmer" and "bona fide agricultural activity".
(b) The bona fide farmer working group shall consist of
the following members:
(1) The chairperson of the board of agriculture and
biosecurity, or the chairperson's designee, who shall
serve as the chair of the working group;
(2) The chairperson of the board of trustees of the office
of Hawaiian affairs, or the chairperson's designee;
2026-2381 SB2153 CDl SMA-2.docx
MigffilMIMflliliNimiHIIHI

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) The executive director of the Hawaii Farm Bureau, or
the executive director's designee, who shall be
invited by the chair of the working group;
(4) The president and chief executive officer of the
Hawaii Farmers Union United, or the president and
chief executive officer's designee, who shall be
invited by the chair of the working group;
(5) The president of the Hawaii Cattlemen's Council, or
the president's designee, who shall be invited by the
chair of the working group; and
(6) The president of the Hawaii Floriculture and Nursery
Association, or the president’s designee, who shall be
invited by the chair of the working group.
(c) The chair of the bona fide farmer working group may
invite other representatives of interested organizations with
relevant experience and expertise to participate in the working
group, as necessary.
(d) In developing the multi-tiered, matrix-based
definitions for the terms "bona fide farmer" and "bona fide
agricultural activity", the bona fide farmer working group shall
consider the following tiers, determine the individuals that are
2026-2381 SB2153 CDl SMA-2.docx
UHIIMBHIHiniOH

Page 4 S.B. NO.
"“2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
to be included in each tier, and examine the feasibility of
implementing the tier system when considering the different
types of farming operations in the State:
(1) Tier I. Entry-level and transitional farmers. Tier I
shall recognize bona fide entry-level and transitional
farms and ensure access to land, water, and
agricultural support resources during the
establishment or recovery phase of a farm;
(2) Tier II. Small-scale and diversified farmers. Tier
II shall recognize bona fide small-scale and
diversified farms without imposing unrealistic or
strictly uniform income thresholds;
(3) Tier III. Commercial and professional farmers. Tier
III shall recognize bona fide commercial and
professional farms and ensure accountability for
operators whose primary livelihood is derived from
agriculture while recognizing sector-specific economic
realities; and
(4) Tier IV. Corporate and institutional agricultural
enterprises. Tier IV shall recognize bona fide
corporate and institutional agricultural enterprises
2026-2381 SB2153 CDl SMA-2.docx
MiiiDiiiHiiiiiimgiiiiiiini

Page 5
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
and ensure that large-scale agricultural enterprises
maintain genuine agricultural operations and do not
use the designation of "bona fide farmer" or "bona
fide agricultural activity" for the purposes of land
speculation or residential development.
(e) Members of the bona fide farmer working group shall
serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for
reasonable expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for
the performance of their duties.
(f) The bona fide farmer working group shall submit a
report of its findings and recommendations, including any
proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty
days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028.
(g) The bona fide farmer working group shall cease to
exist on June 30, 2028.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2381 SB2153 CDl SMA-2.docx

S.B. NO. 2153
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 26th day of June , 2026

S.B. No. 2153, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 1,2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
32-26

SB No. 2153, SD 2, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
-------------
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives